Massachusetts, session 194th, H2215.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
commission to study the feasibility of Massachusetts joining the counseling compact for licensed
mental health counselors.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the house and senate chairs of the joint
committee on consumer protection and professional licensure, who shall serve as the co-chairs;
the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on health care financing or their designee; the
house and senate chairs of the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, or
their designee; one member to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; one
member to be appointed by the house minority leader; one member to be appointed by the senate
of 2

president; one member to be appointed by the senate minority leader; the commissioner of the
department of mental health or designee; one member of the board of Massachusetts Mental
Health Counselors Association, Inc.; one member of the Board of Registration of Allied Mental
Health and Human Services Professionals; one member of the Massachusetts Association for
Mental Health; and one member of the National Alliance on Mental Illness of Greater Boston.
SECTION 3. The commission shall study the feasibility of joining the counseling
compact for licensed mental health counselors and make recommendations to the legislature.
SECTION 4. The commission shall submit its report and findings, along with any
recommendations and drafted legislation, to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate within 6 months of the passage of this
act.
of 2